Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4112
Injunction.

The Nebraska State Patrol or any other aggrieved individual or agency may institute an action in a court of proper jurisdiction against any person, including law enforcement agencies, to enjoin such person or agency from violating the DNA Identification Information Act.

Laws 1997, LB 278, § 12;

Laws 2006, LB 385, § 11.